Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4900.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin NUCLEAR ENERGY STUDY; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, paragraph (j), $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the renewable development account under Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, to the Public Utilities Commission to contract with the Great Plains Institute to conduct a study evaluating the factors affecting the future construction of nuclear-powered electric generating facilities in Minnesota. The study must be completed no later than June 30, 2027, and must, at a minimum, analyze: new text end new text begin (1) changes in federal regulations governing the licensing of nuclear-powered facilities that may expedite the review and approval process; new text end new text begin (2) technological advances made with respect to conventional nuclear-powered facilities that affect safety and cost; new text end new text begin (3) the prospects for factory-built, portable small modular reactors with a capacity of up to 300 megawatts, including: new text end new text begin (i) the type of technology available; new text end new text begin (ii) current licensing status; and new text end new text begin (iii) estimated costs; new text end new text begin (4) siting issues, including: new text end new text begin (i) the degree to which the requirement for proximity to water resources sufficient to meet cooling needs restricts possible locations of nuclear facilities, including a list of locations in Minnesota that currently meet cooling needs; new text end new text begin (ii) the potential for colocating nuclear facilities with businesses that demand very large amounts of electricity; new text end new text begin (iii) the environmental impacts of nuclear facilities, including impacts on the health of nearby residents; new text end new text begin (iv) the prospects for host communities to accept nuclear facilities and best practices to engage communities regarding siting for nuclear facilities; and new text end new text begin (v) how interconnection and transmission issues affect potential plant locations. new text end new text begin (5) nuclear waste issues, including: new text end new text begin (i) the amount and toxicity of radioactive waste produced by both conventional nuclear technologies and small modular reactors; new text end new text begin (ii) the costs of on-site storage; new text end new text begin (iii) the prospects for developing permanent radioactive waste storage at either a federally owned or privately owned repository to which Minnesota's waste could be transported; and new text end new text begin (iv) the feasibility and cost of reprocessing nuclear waste; new text end new text begin (6) the economic impacts of various nuclear technologies on a host community, including: new text end new text begin (i) increased employment levels during construction and operations; new text end new text begin (ii) increased local economic activity resulting from purchases made by the nuclear-powered facility and the facility's employees; and new text end new text begin (iii) potential tax revenue to local communities, schools, and the state; and new text end new text begin (7) impacts of new nuclear-powered electric generating plants on public safety officials and emergency responders in host communities and adjacent areas with respect to emergency planning efforts. new text end new text begin (b) No later than February 1, 2027, the commission must submit the study to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over energy finance and policy. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end